apertium-hye-eng.hye.dix
    <pardef n="մահապատ/իժ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>ժից</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ժի</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ժին</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ժում</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ժով</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժ</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժը</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժն</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժներից</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժների</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժներին</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժներում</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժներով</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժներ</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժները</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>իժներն</l><r>իժ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="հատապտ/ուղ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>ղից</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ղի</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ղին</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ղում</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ղով</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղ</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղը</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղն</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղներից</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղների</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղներին</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղներում</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղներով</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղներ</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղները</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուղներն</l><r>ուղ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="բ/ուդ__n_nn">
      <e><p>          <l>դից</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դի</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դին</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դում</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դով</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուդ</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուդը</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ուդն</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դերից</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դերի</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դերին</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դերում</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դերով</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դեր</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դերը</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>դերն</l><r>ուդ<s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="տիկ/ին__n_aa">
      <e><p>          <l>նոջից</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նոջ</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նոջը</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նոջն</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նոջով</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ին</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ինը</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ինն</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նանցից</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նանց</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նանց</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նանցով</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նայք</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>նայք</l><r>ին<s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="պտուղ"><i>պտ</i><par n="հատապտ/ուղ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ձիթապտուղ"><i>ձիթապտ</i><par n="հատապտ/ուղ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="տիկին"><i>տիկ</i><par n="տիկ/ին__n_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="մահապատիժ"><i>մահապատ</i><par n="մահապատ/իժ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="հատապտուղ"><i>հատապտ</i><par n="հատապտ/ուղ__n_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="բուդ"><i>բ</i><par n="բ/ուդ__n_nn"/></e>
